Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-911
Regional center, defined.

Regional center means a state hospital for the mentally ill as designated in section 83-305.

Laws 1976, LB 806, § 7;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 83-1007;

Laws 2004, LB 1083, § 31.